Missouri, session 2026, HB1948.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 9 and 210, RSMo, are amended by adding thereto two new
sections, to be known as sections 9.411 and 210.1150, to read as follows:
9.411. The month of June is hereby designated as "Fathership Month" in the
state of Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to engage in appropriate
events and activities to raise awareness about the importance of fathers being part of
their children's lives.
210.1150. 1. There is hereby established within the department of social services
the "Missouri Fathership Project". The Missouri fathership project shall be
administered by the department of social services, subject to federal approval and
state appropriations. The Missouri fathership project shall:
(1) Promote fathership by helping fathers achieve greater self-esteem and better
awareness of their responsibilities to their families and community; and
(2) Empower fathers to become successful in fathership by building life skills
and through family reunification, education and career training, employment support,
and child-support compliance.
2. (1) There is hereby established within the department of social services the
"Missouri Fathership Project Grant Program" to provide grants to agencies, programs,
or nonprofit organizations that support and facilitate involvement of fathers in the
community, subject to federal approval and state appropriations. The department shall
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 1948 2
be the administrative body for the implementation of the program established by this
subsection.
(2) The family support division shall prescribe the form and the method for
filing grant applications; determine agencies, programs, or nonprofit organizations
eligible for the grant; and supervise the processing of the program. The application
process under this subdivision shall ensure that grant funds are used to fulfill the
objectives of the Missouri fathership project under this section.
(3) (a) Family-focused community agencies, faith-based agencies, family
advocacy programs, and nonprofit organizations may apply for a grant under this
subsection. Agencies, programs, and organizations selected to receive a grant under this
subsection shall use such moneys to hire, train, and facilitate fathership project
specialists.
(b) Fathership project specialists shall serve as a one-on-one point of contact for
fathers who are seeking to reestablish and strengthen their relationships with their
children. Fathership project specialists shall work directly with fathers to address
challenges that have caused a breakdown of their parenting relationships and help
fathers navigate the system to reunify with their children.
(c) Fathership project specialists shall:
a. Serve as a liaison between fathers and any relevant state agencies or
organizations, including the family court system and the Missouri family support
division;
b. Assist fathers in developing and implementing personalized plans to
reestablish and maintain a relationship with their children; and
c. Provide guidance, support, and resources to fathers to help fathers overcome
compliance barriers with court-ordered case plans and other obstacles preventing
reunification with their children.
(d) If a father ceases to engage with or comply with a court-ordered visitation
and custody order, the court shall issue a referral to a partnering agency, program, or
nonprofit organization utilizing services from a fathership project specialist. The
referring entity shall inform the agency, program, or nonprofit organization that the
father is no longer working toward the goal of reunification, and the agency, program,
or nonprofit organization shall dispatch a fathership project specialist to engage with
the father. If a father requests assistance through the Missouri family support division
or directly to a partnering agency, program, or nonprofit organization, the father shall
also be eligible for assistance from a fathership project specialist.
3. All grants under subsection 2 of this section shall be made from funds
appropriated by the general assembly and any gifts, contributions, grants, or bequests

HCS HB 1948 3
received from federal, private, or other sources to the Missouri fathership project grant
fund established under subsection 4 of this section.
4. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Missouri Fathership
Project Grant Fund", which shall consist of moneys appropriated to it by the general
assembly and any gifts, contributions, grants, or bequests received from federal, private,
or other sources. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with
sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund
shall be a dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, moneys in this fund shall be used
solely as provided under subsection 2 of this section. The fund shall be administered by
the department.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
5. (1) Agencies, programs, or nonprofit organizations receiving grants under
this section shall be required to submit annual reports to the relevant state agency
detailing the use of the funds, the number of fathers engaged in the project, and the
outcomes achieved in terms of father-child reunification and case plan completion.
(2) The department shall establish performance metrics to measure the success
of the Missouri fathership project including, but not limited to, the number of fathers
who successfully completed their case plans, the number of father-child reunifications
facilitated, and the overall improvement in father involvement in the lives of children.
✔